District of Columbia statutes.
2-602

Publication prerequisite for effectiveness of Council acts and resolutions.

No act or resolution shall be effective until the act or resolution has been published in the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, except that any emergency act or resolution approved pursuant to § 1-204.12(a), any resolution to approve or disapprove proposed actions pursuant to § 1-204.12(a)(2) or § 1-204.90(a)(1), or any resolution that pertains to the internal operation or organization of the Council shall be effective without prior publication, but shall be published as soon as practicable.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title II, § 204, 22 DCR 2058
Oct. 30, 1975, D.C. Law 1-27, § 4, 22 DCR 2472
Apr. 7, 1977, D.C. Law 1-115, § 2, 23 DCR 8744
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 6(c), 25 DCR 6960
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-89, § 2, 37 DCR 644
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 8, 40 DCR 6311
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 5, 49 DCR 8140
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 27, 51 DCR 881
Motor vehicles and traffic, moving infractions, exceptions, criminal offenses, amendment of municipal code by publication, see § 50-2302.02.
Publication and codification of acts of D.C. Council, requirements, see § 1-204.04.
This section is referenced in § 50-2302.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1602.
1973 Ed., § 1-1602.
D.C. Law 14-213 substituted “§§ 1-204.12(a)(2), and 1-204.90(a)(1)” for “§ 1-204.12(a)(2)”.
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
Publication requirement exemption: Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-300 provided: “Notwithstanding section 8 of this act and sections 204 and 308(b) of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, effective March 6, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-153; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-602 and 2-558(b)), the text, maps, and graphics of the District elements of the Comprehensive Plan for the National Capital, as amended by this act, need not be published in the District of Columbia Register to become effective.”